Utah statutes.
23-19-45.   Fees and certificates of registration to harvest brine shrimp eggs.

(1)  The Wildlife Board may not impose fees to harvest brine shrimp eggs other than certificate of registration fees.

(2)  Each person holding certificates of registration for the harvesting of brine shrimp eggs in the 1996-97 harvesting season may obtain the same number of certificates of registration for the 1997-98 and 1998-99 harvesting seasons upon payment of the required fee.

